District of Columbia statutes.
47-135

Establishment of working fund — Printing, duplicating, and photographing.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to establish a working fund without fiscal year limitation for the purpose of printing, duplicating, and photographing; and the unexpended balances in the miscellaneous trust fund accounts “Operating Account, Printing” and “Operating Account, Blueprinting” shall be deposited to said working fund; and the fund shall be reimbursed for all services performed thereunder.

History

July 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 263, ch. 272, § 14
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-135.
1973 Ed., § 47-137.

Editor's Notes

Transfer of unexpended balances: Section 7(g) of the Act of June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, provided for the transfer to the Department of General Services Internal Service Fund, or successor fund established by the Mayor, of any unexpended balances in the working capital fund for printing, duplicating, and photographing.